District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.17

Severability.

If any section or sections, clause or clauses, of this part, or any regulations promulgated thereunder, be declared unconstitutional or invalid, that shall not invalidate any other sections or clauses of this part, or any other regulations promulgated thereunder.

History

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 866, ch. 953, § 17
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2317.
1973 Ed., § 2-1817.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.